California statutes. Education Code
 credit any coursework completed for credential purposes or for step increases in programs offered in California by out-of-state institutions of higher education that meet the requirements prescribed by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800) of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 only if the program of courses is offered by a regionally accredited institution of higher education and evidence of satisfactory evaluation by that accrediting body is submitted by the out-of-state institution to the commission for purposes of seeking approval of the program and any courses within that program to enable potential teachers to meet one or more requirements for a teaching credential in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 4.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44227.2.

(a) The Legislature hereby establishes the Science, Technology, Engineering, Math, and Career Technical Education Educator Credentialing Program for purposes of providing alternative routes to credentialing.

(b) No later than June 1, 2010, the commission, in consultation with the Committee on Accreditation established pursuant to Section 44373, shall develop a process to authorize additional high-quality alternative route educator preparation programs provided by school districts, county offices of education, community-based organizations, and nongovernmental organizations. Organizations participating in this project may offer educator preparation programs for any science, mathematics, and career technical education credential type issued by the commission if the
 organization meets the requirements for being authorized pursuant to criteria established by the commission.

(c) The commission shall authorize community-based or nongovernmental organizations accredited by an accrediting organization that is recognized by the Council for Higher Education Accreditation and the United States Department of Education.

(d) Participating organizations shall electronically submit credential applications to the commission.

(e) The commission may assess a fee on a community-based or nongovernmental organization that is seeking approval to participate in the program. For purposes of this section, an independent college or university in California is not a community-based or nongovernmental organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 301, Sec. 9.   (SB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

44227.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that college and university faculty members who teach courses relating to teaching or administrative methods in programs of professional preparation that are approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing have direct knowledge of the way that public elementary and secondary schools function and operate.

(b) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing, in cooperation with public and private postsecondary institutions operating teacher education programs, shall develop standards and procedures which ensure that each faculty member who teaches a course relating to teaching methods in an approved program of professional preparation actively participates in public elementary or secondary schools and classrooms at least once every three academic years.

(c) The commission, in cooperation with public and private postsecondary institutions operating administrative services credential programs, shall develop standards and procedures which ensure that each faculty member who teaches a course relating to administrative methods as defined by the commission in an approved program of professional preparation actively participates in public elementary or secondary schools or classrooms at least once every three academic years.

(d) The commission shall exempt from this requirement faculty members whose primary assignments are in departments or schools other than education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1057, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44227.7.

The Legislature encourages institutions of higher education to provide, in teacher training programs, increased emphasis on the recognition of, and teaching strategies for, specific learning disabilities, including dyslexia and related disorders. Experts in the field of these disabilities should be utilized for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1501, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

44228.

To assist in approving teacher education programs, the commission may appoint panels of educators, including public school classroom teachers, and lay persons to serve as members of visiting teams to institutions and school districts having such programs. The provisions of Sections 44215, 44216, and 44217 shall be applicable to such panels of educators.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

44229.

The commission shall invite the public, the teaching profession, and interested professional groups and associations to appear before it and submit proposals for commission consideration and action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44230.

(a) (1) The commission shall maintain for public record, and may disclose, only the following information relating to the credentials, certificates, permits, or other documents that it issues: the document number, title, term of validity, subjects, authorizations, effective dates, renewal requirements, and restrictions. The commission may also disclose the last known business address of any applicant or credentialholder.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided for in Sections 10871, 44230.6, and 44248, no information, other than that set forth in paragraph (1), may be disclosed by the commission absent an order from a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) In order to
 expedite the application process for the benefit of applicants for credentials, certificates, permits, or other documents issued by the commission, the commission may receive from, or transmit to, the agency that submitted the application, either electronically or by printed copy, the status of, and information set forth in, that application. For purposes of this subdivision, “agency” means a charter school, school district, county office of education, nonpublic school or agency, or institution of higher education having a commission-approved program of professional preparation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 15.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

44230.5.

(a) The commission shall establish a nonpersonally identifiable educator identification number for each educator to whom it issues a credential, certificate, permit, or other document authorizing that individual to provide a service in the public schools. The nonpersonally identifiable educator identification number shall be used for sharing data, including, but not limited to, information obtained pursuant to Sections 44225.6 and 44258.9, with local educational agencies and the department.
 This identification number may also be used to disclose data pursuant to subdivision (t) of Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 782, Sec. 1.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

44230.6.

(a) For purposes of the ongoing evaluation of teacher preparation programs at the California State University, the commission may provide to the Office of the Chancellor of the California State University or the State Department of Education any data it collects, including non-personally identifiable educator identification numbers established pursuant to Section 44230.5 and any other student identifiers necessary for purposes of the ongoing evaluation of these programs at the California State University.

(b) The commission may disclose data pursuant to subdivision (a) only to the extent permitted by state and federal privacy laws, including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

(c) (1) The commission shall directly collect voluntary demographic data as to the ancestry or ethnic origin of California credential applicants and voluntary self-identification information pertaining to sexual orientation and gender identity of an initial or renewal applicant who submits an application online or in paper form as part of the initial or renewal application, or who completes a recommendation for an applicant formally recommended by a commission-approved program. The collection of this data on the application shall meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 8310.8 of the Government Code.

(2) The commission shall not disclose personally identifiable information collected pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 252, Sec. 14.   (AB 167)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

44231.

Unless otherwise specified, the meetings of the commission shall be open and public and due notice of their time and place shall be posted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44232.

The commission may enter into contracts with comparable agencies in other states in order to facilitate the relocation of qualified teachers from one state to another and to expedite other matters related to ascertaining qualifications of credentialed teachers and other educators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1050, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44234.

(a) There is in the State Treasury the Teacher Credentials Fund. All fees levied and collected by the commission shall be deposited in the Teacher Credentials Fund and shall not be transferred to any other fund.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, if at the beginning of any fiscal year the commission has unencumbered funds in an amount which is in excess of its operating budget, plus funds required to implement statutory mandates and other changes to teacher credentials, plus a prudent reserve, which reserve shall not exceed 10 percent of the total amount that the commission is authorized to spend in that fiscal year, as determined by the Department of Finance, the department shall recommend a reduction in credential or other fees, whether fixed by statute or determined by this commission within limits fixed by statute, in an amount which will reduce any surplus funds of the commission.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude the implementation of multiyear mandates that require a reserve amount that is greater than 10 percent in one fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 816, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44235.

(a) (1) Fees shall be levied by the commission for the issuance and renewal of teaching and service credentials. Commencing January 1, 1987, the fee for the issuance and renewal of teaching and service credentials shall be fifty dollars ($50). In subsequent years, through June 30, 2026, the commission may set a different fee, but in no case shall a fee exceed one hundred dollars ($100) without express legislative approval.

(2) Commencing July 1, 2026, the fee for the issuance of teaching and service credentials shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(3) Commencing July 1, 2026, the fee for the renewal of teaching and service clear credentials shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).

(b) A single fee, not to exceed the charge for a single supplemental credential, shall be charged for all supplemental credentials applied for at the same time as a teaching or service credential pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Subject to funds being appropriated expressly for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, fees authorized by this section
 shall be waived by the commission for first-time teaching credential applicants for the following credentials:

(1) Single subject credential.

(2) Multiple subject credential.

(3) Special education credential.

(4) Specialist instruction credential.

(d) Annually, as part of the budget review process, the Department of Finance shall recommend to the Legislature an appropriate credential fee sufficient to generate revenues necessary to support the operating budget of the commission plus a prudent reserve, as determined by the Department of Finance pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44234.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 58.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44235.1.

(a) Effective July 1, 1987, through June 30, 2023, all fees collected by the commission for tests, examinations, or assessments shall be deposited in the Test Development and Administration Account, which is hereby created in the Teacher Credentials Fund.

(b) Any proposed expenditures from this account shall be subject to the normal legislative budget review process.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (e) or unless otherwise authorized by the Legislature, funds deposited in this account shall be expended for the development, agency support, maintenance, or administration of tests or other assessments established, required, or administered by the
 commission.

(d) Funds in this account shall not be subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 44234.

(e) (1) If there is a deficiency in the Teacher Credentials Fund, the Department of Finance may authorize a loan from the Test Development and Administration Account to the Teacher Credentials Fund to the extent needed to cover the projected deficiency.

(2) Any loan made under this subdivision shall be repaid under the terms provided in the authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 29.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

44235.12.

(a) Effective July 1, 2023, all fees collected by the commission for tests, examinations, or assessments shall be deposited in the Teacher Credentials Fund.

(b) Any proposed expenditures from the Teacher Credentials Fund shall be subject to the normal legislative budget review process pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 44235.

(c) Except as otherwise authorized by the Legislature, these funds shall be expended for the development, agency support, maintenance, or administration of tests or other assessments established, required, or administered by the commission.

(d) Fees collected by the commission for tests,
 examinations, and assessments shall not be subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 44234.

(e) This section shall become operative July 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 30.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

44235.2.

(a) If in any month there are insufficient moneys in the Teacher Credentials Fund to satisfy monthly payroll obligations and scheduled claims, and there are moneys in the Test Development and Administration Account not required to meet any demand that has accrued or may accrue against it, the Controller shall transfer moneys from the Test Development and Administration Account to the Teacher Credentials Fund to the extent necessary to meet the immediate obligations of the Teacher Credentials Fund.

(b) Moneys transferred pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be returned to the Test Development and Administration Account as soon as there are sufficient moneys in the Teacher Credentials Fund to do so, but by no later than 60 days after the transfer was made.

(c) If sufficient moneys do not accumulate in the Teacher Credentials Fund within 60 days after the transfer was made, whatever portion of the amount received from the Test Development and Administration Account that is in the Teacher Credentials Fund at that time shall be returned to the Test Development and Administration Account. The remaining balance of the outstanding transfer, if any, shall be returned thereafter in monthly installments as moneys accumulate in the Teacher Credentials Fund. If the Teacher Credentials Fund fails to return the full amount of any transfer by the end of the fiscal year, the Teacher Credentials Fund shall be ineligible to receive further transfers until it has returned the full amount previously transferred from the Test Development and Administration Account.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1,
 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 31.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

44235.25.

The Test Development and Administration Account is hereby abolished on July 1, 2024, and all unencumbered moneys and authority in the fund are transferred to the Teacher Credentials Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 27.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

44235.3.

Within the limits set forth in this chapter, the commission may establish and collect fees to recover its costs for the development and administration of any subject matter examination adopted by the commission to implement the provisions of this chapter, unless the costs are recovered by appropriations from another source of funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1355, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

44235.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission shall waive all application and processing fees for the initial issuance of a teaching credential to an out-of-state prepared applicant who relocates to California due to orders received from a branch of the United States Armed Forces that require the applicant’s spouse to relocate to California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 125, Sec. 1.   (AB 794)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44236.

Any fee or excess amount of fee paid under Section 44235 may be refunded by the commission from the Teacher Credentials Fund when the applicant does not qualify for a credential or when such fee or excess is paid in error, and the amount of any such refund is hereby appropriated for the making of such refund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44237.

(a) Every person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation offering or conducting private school instruction on the elementary or high school level shall require each applicant for employment in a position requiring contact with minor pupils to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check. Every employer shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in this subdivision who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(b) (1) As used in this section, “employer” means every person, firm,
 association, partnership, or corporation offering or conducting
 private school instruction on the elementary or high school level.

(2) As used in this section, “employment” means the act of engaging the services of a person, who will have contact with pupils, to work in a position at a private school at the elementary or high school level on or after September 30, 1997, on a regular, paid full-time basis, regular, paid part-time basis, or paid full-time or part-time seasonal basis.

(3) As used in this section, “applicant” means any person who is seriously being considered for employment by an employer.

(4) This section does not apply to a secondary school pupil working at the school they attend or a parent or legal guardian working exclusively with their children.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) An employer shall not employ a person until the Department of Justice completes its check of the state criminal history file as set forth in this section.

(e) (1) An employer shall not employ a person who has been convicted of a violent or serious felony or a person who would be prohibited from employment by a public school district pursuant to any provision of this code because of their conviction for any crime.

(2) A person who would be prohibited from employment by a private school pursuant
 to paragraph (1) shall not, on or after July 1, 1999, own or operate a private school offering instruction on the elementary or high school level.

(f) An employer shall request subsequent arrest service from the Department of Justice as provided under Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.

(g) This section applies to any violent or serious offense that, if committed in this state, would have been punishable as a violent or serious felony.

(h) For purposes of this section, a violent felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code and a serious felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), a person shall not be denied employment or terminated from employment solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a violent or serious felony if the person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(j) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), a person shall not be denied employment or terminated from employment solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a serious felony that is not also a violent felony if that person can prove to the sentencing court of the offense in question, by clear and convincing evidence, that they have been rehabilitated for the purposes of school employment for at least one year. If the offense in question occurred outside this state,
 then the person may seek a finding of rehabilitation from the court in the county in which they are a resident.

(k) The commission shall make available to each private school a listing of all credentialholders who have had final adverse action taken against their credential. The information shall be identical to that made available to public schools in the state. The commission shall also send on a quarterly basis a complete and updated list of all teachers who have had their teaching credentials revoked or suspended, excluding teachers who have had their credentials reinstated, or who are deceased.

(l) The Department of Justice may charge a reasonable fee to cover costs associated with the processing, reviewing, and supplying of the criminal record summary as required by
 this section. The fee shall not exceed the actual costs incurred by the Department of Justice.

(m) Where reasonable access to the statewide electronic fingerprinting network is available, the Department of Justice may mandate electronic submission of the fingerprints and related information required by this section.

(n) All information obtained from the Department of Justice is confidential. Agencies handling Department of Justice information shall ensure the following:

(1) A recipient shall not disclose its contents or provide copies of information.

(2) Information received shall be stored in a locked file separate from other files, and shall only be
 accessible to the custodian of records.

(3) Information received shall be destroyed upon the hiring determination in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 708 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) Compliance with destruction, storage, dissemination, auditing, backgrounding, and training requirements as set forth in Sections 700 to 708, inclusive, of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 11077 of the Penal Code governing the use and security of criminal offender record information is the responsibility of the entity receiving the information from the Department of Justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 8.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44238.

(a) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall contract with an independent evaluator with proven expertise in design and research to conduct a study of the availability and effectiveness of cultural competency training for teachers and administrators.

(b) The study shall focus on 10 culturally diverse schools that reflect the diverse demography and geography of California. The schools shall be selected for the study based on appropriate research methods. The criteria for school selection shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The cultural demographics of the pupil population within the school including, but not limited to, linguistic demographics and the number of English learners.

(2) The Academic Performance Index scores for each school. The study shall include schools that were previously low-performing schools that have shown significant progress in their Academic Performance Index scores and include schools that were low-performing schools that have not shown significant progress in their Academic Performance Index scores.

(3) The experience of teachers, including, but not limited to, the number of teachers with emergency credentials.

(c) The study shall entail all of the following:

(1) Evaluating cultural competency training programs by doing all of the following:

(A) Assessing the availability and effectiveness of cultural competency training in teacher credentialing programs and professional development programs in which the teachers and administrators of each school have participated, including, but not limited to, university teacher preparation programs, university and district intern programs, distance learning schools, programs implemented pursuant to the California Beginning Teacher Support and Assessment System (Art. 4.5 (commencing with Sec. 44279.1), Ch. 2, Part 25), preinternship programs, and professional development institutes.

(i) The study shall consider pupil performance as one of many measures to determine the effectiveness of cultural competency training programs.

(ii) The study shall also consider the Academic Performance Index score of each school and their correlation to cultural competency training.

(B) Describing the cultural competency component of the training programs in which the teachers and administrators of each school have participated.

(C) Reporting on identifiable differences in cultural competency training in schools with a higher score on the Academic Performance Index compared to schools with a lower score on the Academic Performance Index.

(D) Determining whether cultural competency training programs at each school are correlated to higher pupil performance.

(E) Summarizing the participation rate of the teachers and administrators of each school in teacher credentialing programs, professional development programs, and other training programs.

(2) Evaluating teacher demographics at each school by doing both of the following:

(A) Summarizing the training, experience, cultural demographics, and other background characteristics of the teacher and administrative population at each school.

(B) Summarizing the patterns, criteria, and attributes that are priorities for staff hiring, compensation, and training at each school.

(3) Evaluating the cultural demographics of the pupil population at each school.

(4) Evaluating the commitment of each school to cultural competency by doing both of the following:

(A) Determining whether each school and its school district have a plan or timeline for achieving cultural competency in the classroom.

(B) Discussing the responsiveness of each school and its school district to their communities with regard to developing cultural competency training programs.

(5) Evaluating parent interactions at each school by doing all of the following:

(A) Describing the interaction between parents, parent organizations, teachers, administrators, and pupils at each school.

(B) Describing the procedures and policies that influence the interactions between each school and its administrators, teachers, parents, parent organizations, and pupils.

(C) Determining whether cultural competency training is effective in building connections between teachers, administrators, pupils, and their families.

(D) Reporting on identifiable differences in community and parental involvement in schools with higher scores on the Academic Performance Index compared to schools with lower scores on the Academic Performance Index.

(d) Upon the conclusion of the study, and on or before May 1, 2005, the independent evaluator shall submit to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature a report that includes recommendations of all of the following, based on the results of the study:

(1) Ways to improve access to cultural competency training programs for teachers and administrators who attend teacher credentialing programs and professional development programs.

(2) Criteria for cultural competency training programs.

(3) Further studies that are necessary to provide information about types of cultural competency training programs that correlate to higher pupil performance.

(4) A model program related to the results of the study that may be implemented as a pilot program in other schools.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following phrases are defined as follows:

(1) “Cultural competency” includes, but is not limited to, adequate knowledge of diverse cultures, including languages, that may be encountered by a teacher in the classroom and the appropriate skills to work with pupils and their families.

(2) “Cultural demographics” includes, but is not limited to, familial country of origin and language, cultural traditions, and beliefs.

(3) “Low-performing schools” means schools that are ranked in the lowest two deciles on the Academic Performance Index.

(4) “Pupil performance” includes, but is not limited to, test scores, attendance rates, and graduation rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 817, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

44238.5.

(a) On or before March 1, 2027, the commission shall, with input from the education field, develop, establish, and promulgate, through the regulatory process pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, efficient routes for the following:

(1) Teacher candidates to obtain a multiple subject credential, a single subject credential, or a PK–3 early childhood education specialist instruction credential, and an education specialist credential, known as dual credentialing.

(2) Existing teachers who hold a multiple subject credential, a single subject credential, or a PK–3 early childhood education specialist instruction credential to obtain an education specialist credential.

(3) Existing
 teachers who hold an education specialist credential to obtain a multiple subject credential, a single subject credential, or a PK–3 early childhood education specialist instruction credential.

(b) In developing efficient routes pursuant to subdivision (a), the
 commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Review current routes that holders of multiple subject and single subject credentials have to earn additional credentials and supplementary authorizations, pursuant to the commission’s authorization provided in subdivision (e) of Section 44225.

(2) Determine which content of preparation in multiple subject and single subject programs and education specialist programs could satisfy the requirements for both credentials to create efficiencies toward earning dual credentials.

(3) Review whether supplementary authorizations to an existing credential, authorizing the teaching of pupils with or without disabilities, could be developed.

(4) Identify barriers and opportunities for teachers to become dually credentialed and barriers and opportunities for programs of preparation to prepare dually credentialed teachers.

(5) Review any readily available information about
 other states’ routes to dual credentialing through programs of preparation or for existing holders of credentials specified in subdivision (a).

(6) Identify any necessary statutory
 changes to establish routes to dual credentialing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 390, Sec. 2.   (AB 1119)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44239.

The commission, the State Board of Education, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall notify one another regarding proposed and adopted policies and regulations, in order to achieve consistency in state policies concerning the professional preparation of teachers, and curriculum and instruction in the public elementary and secondary schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1355, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Committee of Credentials [44240. - 44248.]

44240.

(a) The commission shall appoint a Committee of Credentials, consisting of seven persons for terms fixed by the commission but not to exceed two years. The committee shall include:

(1) One member who shall be a full-time certified classroom teacher in the public elementary schools with not less than five years of classroom experience.

(2) One member who shall be a full-time certified classroom teacher in the public
 secondary schools with not less than five years of classroom experience.

(3) One member who shall be a certified administrative employee in the public schools.

(4) One member who shall be a member of the governing board of a school district. A member of the governing board of a school district
 whose tenure on the governing board ends while serving a term on the committee may continue to serve the remainder of the term on the committee, but shall be ineligible for reappointment to the committee pursuant to this paragraph.

(5) Three members who shall be representatives of the public. No person who is currently employed in a certificated position in the public schools or who is currently a member of the governing board of a school district or a county board of education shall be appointed as a public member.

(b) (1) (A) The commission may establish an alternate list of individuals qualified pursuant to subdivision (a) for the purpose of filling an unanticipated
 vacancy on the Committee of Credentials.

(B) If a member of the committee is absent from any four regularly scheduled meetings in a calendar year, his or her position shall be deemed vacant.

(2) The commission may also establish a substitute list of individuals qualified pursuant to subdivision (a) who have at least 12 months of prior experience serving on the committee. The commission may designate an individual on the substitute list as a short-term substitute in the temporary absence of a regular member.

(c) Appointments to the Committee of Credentials shall reflect, to the extent feasible, the ethnic and cultural diversity of California public schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 360, Sec. 1.   (SB 1383)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44241.

Sections 44215, 44216, 44217, 44218, 44220, and 44221 are applicable to the Committee of Credentials.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44242.

The Committee of Credentials shall be under the direct supervision of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44242.5.

(a) Each allegation of an act or omission by an applicant for, or holder of, a credential for which the applicant may be subject to an adverse action shall be presented to the Committee of Credentials.

(b) The committee has jurisdiction to commence an initial review upon receipt of any of the following:

(1) (A) Official records of the Department of Justice, of a law enforcement agency, of a state or federal court, and of any other agency of this state or another state.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), “agency of this state” has the same meaning as that of “state agency” as set forth in Section 11000 of the
 Government Code.

(2) An affidavit or declaration signed by a person with personal knowledge of the acts alleged to constitute misconduct.

(3) (A) A statement from an employer notifying the commission that, as a result of an allegation of misconduct, or while an allegation of misconduct is pending, a credentialholder has been dismissed, nonreelected, suspended for more than 10 days, or placed pursuant to a final adverse employment action on unpaid administrative leave for more than 10 days, or has resigned or otherwise left employment.

(B) The employer shall provide the notice described in subparagraph (A) to the commission not later than 30 days after the dismissal, nonreelection, suspension, placement on unpaid administrative leave, resignation, or departure from employment of the employee.

(C) For purposes of subparagraphs (A) and (B), a change in status due solely to unsatisfactory performance pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932 or a reduction in force pursuant to Sections 44955 to 44958, inclusive, is not a result of an allegation of misconduct.

(4) A notice from an employer that a complaint was filed with the school district alleging sexual misconduct by a credentialholder. Results of an investigation by the committee based on this paragraph shall not be considered for action by the committee unless there is evidence presented to the committee in the form of a written or oral declaration under penalty of perjury that confirms the personal knowledge of the declarant regarding the acts alleged to constitute misconduct.

(5) A notice from a school district, employer, public
 agency, or testing administrator of a violation of Section 44420, 44421.1, 44421.5, or 44439.

(6) (A) An affirmative response on an application submitted to the commission as to any conviction, adverse action on, or denial of, a license, or pending investigation into a criminal allegation or pending investigation of a noncriminal allegation of misconduct by a governmental licensing entity.

(B) Failure to disclose any matter set forth in subparagraph (A).

(7) (A) A record of a substantiated report entered into the statewide data system established pursuant to Section 44052.

(B) A record of a start of an investigation followed by a change in employment status during the investigation entered into the statewide
 data system established pursuant to Section 44052.

(c) An initial review commences on the date that the written notice is mailed to the applicant or credentialholder that their fitness to hold a credential is under review. Upon commencement of a formal review pursuant to Section 44244, the committee shall investigate all alleged misconduct and the circumstances in mitigation and aggravation. The investigation shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Investigation of the fitness and competence of the applicant or credentialholder to perform the duties authorized by the credential for which they have applied or that they presently hold.

(2) Preparation of a summary of the applicable law, a summary of the facts, contested and uncontested, and a summary of any circumstances in aggravation or
 mitigation of the allegation.
